Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-214
Fee book; entries; duty of clerk.

The Clerk of the Supreme Court of the State of Nebraska shall keep a book, which shall be provided by the state, and which shall be known as the Fee Book of the Clerk of the Supreme Court, and shall be a part of the records of said office, and in which shall be entered every item of fees collected by him, showing in separate columns the name of the party from whom received, the time of receiving the same, the amount received and for what service the same was charged.

Laws 1909, c. 39, § 1, p. 223;

R.S.1913, § 1150;

Laws 1921, c. 213, § 2, p. 753;

C.S.1922, § 1079;

C.S.1929, § 27-214;

R.S.1943, § 24-214.